Utah statutes.
20A-3-202.   Challenges to a voter's eligibility -- Basis for challenge -- Procedures.

(1)  A person's right to vote may be challenged because:

(a)  the voter is not the person whose name appears in the official register or under which name the right to vote is claimed;

(b)  the voter is not a resident of Utah;

(c)  the voter is not a citizen of the United States;

(d)  the voter has not or will not have resided in Utah for 30 days immediately before the date of the election;

(e)  the voter's principal place of residence is not in the voting precinct claimed;

(f)  the voter's principal place of residence is not in the geographic boundaries of the election area;

(g)  the voter has already voted in the election;

(h)  the voter is not at least 18 years of age;

(i)  the voter has been convicted of a misdemeanor for an offense under this title and the voter's right to vote in an election has not been restored under Section 20A-2-101.3;

(j)  the voter is a convicted felon and the voter's right to vote in an election has not been restored under Section 20A-2-101.5; or

(k)  in a regular primary election or in the Western States Presidential Primary, the voter does not meet the political party affiliation requirements for the ballot the voter seeks to vote.

(2)  A person who challenges another person's right to vote at an election shall do so according to the procedures and requirements of:

(a)  Section 20A-3-202.3, for challenges issued in writing more than 21 days before the day on which voting commences; or

(b)  Section 20A-3-202.5, for challenges issued in person at the time of voting.

